Maryland, session 2026, HB0473.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
6–406.
(c) (1) On request a public school employer or at least two of its designated
representatives shall meet and negotiate with at least two representatives of the employee
organization that is designated as the exclusive negotiating agent for the public school
employees in a unit of the county on all matters that relate to:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0473*

HOUSE BILL 473
(i) Salaries, wages, hours, and other working conditions, including
procedures regarding employee transfers and assignments;
(ii) The structure, time, and manner of the access of the exclusive
representative to a public school employer’s new employee processing as required under §
6–405 of this subtitle; and
(iii) A career ladder for educators established under Subtitle 10 of
this title.
(2) Except as provided in paragraph (3) of this subsection, a public school
employer or at least two of its designated representatives may negotiate with at least two
representatives of the employee organization that is designated as the exclusive negotiating
agent for the public school employees in a unit of the county on other matters that are
mutually agreed to by the employer and the employee organization.
(3) A public school employer may not negotiate the school calendar[, the
maximum number of students assigned to a class,] or any matter that is precluded by
applicable statutory law.
(4) A matter that is not subject to negotiation under paragraph (2) of this
subsection because it has not been mutually agreed to by the employer and the employee
organization may not be raised in any action taken to resolve an impasse under subsection
(e) of this section.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.